I am happy to join with you today in what will go down in history as the greatest demonstration for freedom in the history of our nation.
Five score years ago, a great American, in whose symbolic shadow we stand today, signed the Emancipation Proclamation.
This momentous decree came as a great beacon light of hope to millions of Negro slaves who had been seared in the flames of withering injustice.
It came as a joyous daybreak to end the long night of their captivity.
But one hundred years later, the Negro still is not free.
One hundred years later, the life of the Negro is still sadly crippled by the manacles of segregation and the chains of discrimination.
One hundred years later, the Negro lives on a lonely island of poverty in the midst of a vast ocean of material prosperity.
One hundred years later, the Negro is still languished in the corners of American society and finds himself an exile in his own land.
And so we've come here today to dramatize a shameful condition.
In a sense we've come to our nation's capital to cash a check.
When the architects of our republic wrote the magnificent words of the Constitution and the Declaration of Independence, they were signing a promissory note to which every American was to fall heir.
This note was a promise that all men, yes, black men as well as white men, would be guaranteed the "unalienable Rights" of "Life, Liberty and the pursuit of Happiness.
It is obvious today that America has defaulted on this promissory note, insofar as her citizens of color are concerned.
Instead of honoring this sacred obligation, America has given the Negro people a bad check, a check which has come back marked "insufficient funds.
But we refuse to believe that the bank of justice is bankrupt.
We refuse to believe that there are insufficient funds in the great vaults of opportunity of this nation.
And so, we've come to cash this check, a check that will give us upon demand the riches of freedom and the security of justice.
We have also come to this hallowed spot to remind America of the fierce urgency of Now.
This is no time to engage in the luxury of cooling off or to take the tranquilizing drug of gradualism.
Now is the time to make real the promises of democracy.
Now is the time to rise from the dark and desolate valley of segregation to the sunlit path of racial justice.
Now is the time to lift our nation from the quicksands of racial injustice to the solid rock of brotherhood.
Now is the time to make justice a reality for all of God's children.
It would be fatal for the nation to overlook the urgency of the moment.
This sweltering summer of the Negro's legitimate discontent will not pass until there is an invigorating autumn of freedom and equality.
Nineteen sixty-three is not an end, but a beginning.
And those who hope that the Negro needed to blow off steam and will now be content will have a rude awakening if the nation returns to business as usual.
And there will be neither rest nor tranquility in America until the Negro is granted his citizenship rights.
The whirlwinds of revolt will continue to shake the foundations of our nation until the bright day of justice emerges.
But there is something that I must say to my people, who stand on the warm threshold which leads into the palace of justice: In the process of gaining our rightful place, we must not be guilty of wrongful deeds.
Let us not seek to satisfy our thirst for freedom by drinking from the cup of bitterness and hatred.
We must forever conduct our struggle on the high plane of dignity and discipline.
We must not allow our creative protest to degenerate into physical violence.
Again and again, we must rise to the majestic heights of meeting physical force with soul force.
The marvelous new militancy which has engulfed the Negro community must not lead us to a distrust of all white people, for many of our white brothers, as evidenced by their presence here today, have come to realize that their destiny is tied up with our destiny.
And they have come to realize that their freedom is inextricably bound to our freedom.
We cannot walk alone.
And as we walk, we must make the pledge that we shall always march ahead.
We cannot turn back.
There are those who are asking the devotees of civil rights, "When will you be satisfied?" We can never be satisfied as long as the Negro is the victim of the unspeakable horrors of police brutality.
We can never be satisfied as long as our bodies, heavy with the fatigue of travel, cannot gain lodging in the motels of the highways and the hotels of the cities.
**We cannot be satisfied as long as the negro's basic mobility is from a smaller ghetto to a larger one.
We can never be satisfied as long as our children are stripped of their self-hood and robbed of their dignity by signs stating: "For Whites Only.
** We cannot be satisfied as long as a Negro in Mississippi cannot vote and a Negro in New York believes he has nothing for which to vote.
No, no, we are not satisfied, and we will not be satisfied until "justice rolls down like waters, and righteousness like a mighty stream.
I am not unmindful that some of you have come here out of great trials and tribulations.
Some of you have come fresh from narrow jail cells.
And some of you have come fom areas where your quest -- quest for freedom left you battered by the storms of persecution and staggered by the winds of police brutality.
You have been the veterans of creative suffering.
Continue to work with the faith that unearned suffering is redemptive.
Go back to Mississippi, go back to Alabama, go back to South Carolina, go back to Georgia, go back to Louisiana, go back to the slums and ghettos of our northern cities, knowing that somehow this situation can and will be changed.
Let us not wallow in the valley of despair, I say to you today, my friends.
And so even though we face the difficulties of today and tomorrow, I still have a dream.
It is a dream deeply rooted in the American dream.
I have a dream that one day this nation will rise up and live out the true meaning of its creed: "We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal.
I have a dream that one day on the red hills of Georgia, the sons of former slaves and the sons of former slave owners will be able to sit down together at the table of brotherhood.
I have a dream that one day even the state of Mississippi, a state sweltering with the heat of injustice, sweltering with the heat of oppression, will be transformed into an oasis of freedom and justice.
I have a dream that my four little children will one day live in a nation where they will not be judged by the color of their skin but by the content of their character.
I have a dream today!I have a dream that one day, down in Alabama, with its vicious racists, with its governor having his lips dripping with the words of "interposition" and "nullification" -- one day right there in Alabama little black boys and black girls will be able to join hands with little white boys and white girls as sisters and brothers.
I have a dream today!I have a dream that one day every valley shall be exalted, and every hill and mountain shall be made low, the rough places will be made plain, and the crooked places will be made straight; "and the glory of the Lord shall be revealed and all flesh shall see it together.
This is our hope, and this is the faith that I go back to the South with.
With this faith, we will be able to hew out of the mountain of despair a stone of hope.
With this faith, we will be able to transform the jangling discords of our nation into a beautiful symphony of brotherhood.
With this faith, we will be able to work together, to pray together, to struggle together, to go to jail together, to stand up for freedom together, knowing that we will be free one day.
And this will be the day -- this will be the day when all of God's children will be able to sing with new meaning:My country 'tis of thee, sweet land of liberty, of thee I sing.
Land where my fathers died, land of the Pilgrim's pride,    From every mountainside, let freedom ring!And if America is to be a great nation, this must become true.
And so let freedom ring from the prodigious hilltops of New Hampshire.
Let freedom ring from the mighty mountains of New York.
Let freedom ring from the heightening Alleghenies of Pennsylvania.
Let freedom ring from the snow-capped Rockies of Colorado.
Let freedom ring from the curvaceous slopes of California.
But not only that:Let freedom ring from Stone Mountain of Georgia.
Let freedom ring from Lookout Mountain of Tennessee.
Let freedom ring from every hill and molehill of Mississippi.
From every mountainside, let freedom ring.
And when this happens, and when we allow freedom ring, when we let it ring from every village and every hamlet, from every state and every city, we will be able to speed up that day when all of God's children, black men and white men, Jews and Gentiles, Protestants and Catholics, will be able to join hands and sing in the words of the old Negro spiritual:Free at last! Free at last!Thank God Almighty, we are free at last!Reverend Meza, Reverend Reck, I'm grateful for your generous invitation to state my views.
While the so-called religious issue is necessarily and properly the chief topic here tonight, I want to emphasize from the outset that I believe that we have far more critical issues in the 1960 campaign; the spread of Communist influence, until it now festers only 90 miles from the coast of Florida -- the humiliating treatment of our President and Vice President by those who no longer respect our power -- the hungry children I saw in West Virginia, the old people who cannot pay their doctors bills, the families forced to give up their farms -- an America with too many slums, with too few schools, and too late to the moon and outer space.
These are the real issues which should decide this campaign.
And they are not religious issues -- for war and hunger and ignorance and despair know no religious barrier.
But because I am a Catholic, and no Catholic has ever been elected President, the real issues in this campaign have been obscured -- perhaps deliberately, in some quarters less responsible than this.
So it is apparently necessary for me to state once again -- not what kind of church I believe in, for that should be important only to me -- but what kind of America I believe in.
I believe in an America where the separation of church and state is absolute; where no Catholic prelate would tell the President -- should he be Catholic -- how to act, and no Protestant minister would tell his parishioners for whom to vote; where no church or church school is granted any public funds or political preference, and where no man is denied public office merely because his religion differs from the President who might appoint him, or the people who might elect him.
I believe in an America that is officially neither Catholic, Protestant nor Jewish; where no public official either requests or accept instructions on public policy from the Pope, the National Council of Churches or any other ecclesiastical source; where no religious body seeks to impose its will directly or indirectly upon the general populace or the public acts of its officials, and where religious liberty is so indivisible that an act against one church is treated as an act against all.
For while this year it may be a Catholic against whom the finger of suspicion is pointed, in other years it has been -- and may someday be again -- a Jew, or a Quaker, or a Unitarian, or a Baptist.
It was Virginia's harassment of Baptist preachers, for example, that led to Jefferson's statute of religious freedom.
Today, I may be the victim, but tomorrow it may be you -- until the whole fabric of our harmonious society is ripped apart at a time of great national peril.
Finally, I believe in an America where religious intolerance will someday end, where all men and all churches are treated as equals, where every man has the same right to attend or not to attend the church of his choice, where there is no Catholic vote, no anti-Catholic vote, no bloc voting of any kind, and where Catholics, Protestants, and Jews, at both the lay and the pastoral levels, will refrain from those attitudes of disdain and division which have so often marred their works in the past, and promote instead the American ideal of brotherhood.
That is the kind of America in which I believe.
And it represents the kind of Presidency in which I believe, a great office that must be neither humbled by making it the instrument of any religious group nor tarnished by arbitrarily withholding it -- its occupancy from the members of any one religious group.
I believe in a President whose views on religion are his own private affair, neither imposed upon him by the nation, nor imposed by the nation upon him¹ as a condition to holding that office.
I would not look with favor upon a President working to subvert the first amendment's guarantees of religious liberty; nor would our system of checks and balances permit him to do so.
And neither do I look with favor upon those who would work to subvert Article VI of the Constitution by requiring a religious test, even by indirection.
For if they disagree with that safeguard, they should be openly working to repeal it.
I want a Chief Executive whose public acts are responsible to all and obligated to none, who can attend any ceremony, service, or dinner his office may appropriately require of him to fulfill; and whose fulfillment of his Presidential office is not limited or conditioned by any religious oath, ritual, or obligation.
This is the kind of America I believe in -- and this is the kind of America I fought for in the South Pacific, and the kind my brother died for in Europe.
No one suggested then that we might have a divided loyalty, that we did not believe in liberty, or that we belonged to a disloyal group that threatened -- I quote -- "the freedoms for which our forefathers died.
And in fact this is the kind of America for which our forefathers did die when they fled here to escape religious test oaths that denied office to members of less favored churches -- when they fought for the Constitution, the Bill of Rights, the Virginia Statute of Religious Freedom -- and when they fought at the shrine I visited today, the Alamo.
For side by side with Bowie and Crockett died Fuentes, and McCafferty, and Bailey, and Badillo, and Carey -- but no one knows whether they were Catholics or not.
For there was no religious test there.
I ask you tonight to follow in that tradition -- to judge me on the basis of 14 years in the Congress, on my declared stands against an Ambassador to the Vatican, against unconstitutional aid to parochial schools, and against any boycott of the public schools -- which I attended myself.
And instead of doing this, do not judge me on the basis of these pamphlets and publications we all have seen that carefully select quotations out of context from the statements of Catholic church leaders, usually in other countries, frequently in other centuries, and rarely relevant to any situation here.
And always omitting, of course, the statement of the American Bishops in 1948 which strongly endorsed Church-State separation, and which more nearly reflects the views of almost every American Catholic.
I do not consider these other quotations binding upon my public acts.
Why should you?But let me say, with respect to other countries, that I am wholly opposed to the State being used by any religious group, Catholic or Protestant, to compel, prohibit, or prosecute the free exercise of any other religion.
And that goes for any persecution, at any time, by anyone, in any country.
 And I hope that you and I condemn with equal fervor those nations which deny their Presidency to Protestants, and those which deny it to Catholics.
And rather than cite the misdeeds of those who differ, I would also cite the record of the Catholic Church in such nations as France and Ireland, and the independence of such statesmen as De Gaulle and Adenauer.
But let me stress again that these are my views.
For contrary to common newspaper usage, I am not the Catholic candidate for President.
I am the Democratic Party's candidate for President who happens also to be a Catholic.
I do not speak for my church on public matters; and the church does not speak for me.
Whatever issue may come before me as President, if I should be elected, on birth control, divorce, censorship, gambling or any other subject, I will make my decision in accordance with these views -- in accordance with what my conscience tells me to be in the national interest, and without regard to outside religious pressure or dictates.
And no power or threat of punishment could cause me to decide otherwise.
But if the time should ever come -- and I do not concede any conflict to be remotely possible -- when my office would require me to either violate my conscience or violate the national interest, then I would resign the office; and I hope any conscientious public servant would do likewise.
But I do not intend to apologize for these views to my critics of either Catholic or Protestant faith; nor do I intend to disavow either my views or my church in order to win this election.
If I should lose on the real issues, I shall return to my seat in the Senate, satisfied that I'd tried my best and was fairly judged.
But if this election is decided on the basis that 40 million Americans lost their chance of being President on the day they were baptized, then it is the whole nation that will be the loser, in the eyes of Catholics and non-Catholics around the world, in the eyes of history, and in the eyes of our own people.
But if, on the other hand, I should win this election, then I shall devote every effort of mind and spirit to fulfilling the oath of the Presidency -- practically identical, I might add, with the oath I have taken for 14 years in the Congress.
For without reservation, I can, "solemnly swear that I will faithfully execute the office of President of the United States, and will to the best of my ability preserve, protect, and defend the Constitution -- so help me God.
President Hoover, Mr.
Chief Justice, my friends: This is a day of national consecration.
And I am certain that on this day my fellow Americans expect that on my induction into the Presidency, I will address them with a candor and a decision which the present situation of our people impels.
This is preeminently the time to speak the truth, the whole truth, frankly and boldly.
Nor need we shrink from honestly facing conditions in our country today.
This great Nation will endure, as it has endured, will revive and will prosper.
So, first of all, let me assert my firm belief that the only thing we have to fear is fear itself -- nameless, unreasoning, unjustified terror which paralyzes needed efforts to convert retreat into advance.
In every dark hour of our national life, a leadership of frankness and of vigor has met with that understanding and support of the people themselves which is essential to victory.
And I am convinced that you will again give that support to leadership in these critical days.
In such a spirit on my part and on yours we face our common difficulties.
They concern, thank God, only material things.
Values have shrunk to fantastic levels; taxes have risen; our ability to pay has fallen; government of all kinds is faced by serious curtailment of income; the means of exchange are frozen in the currents of trade; the withered leaves of industrial enterprise lie on every side; farmers find no markets for their produce; and the savings of many years in thousands of families are gone.
More important, a host of unemployed citizens face the grim problem of existence, and an equally great number toil with little return.
Only a foolish optimist can deny the dark realities of the moment.
And yet our distress comes from no failure of substance.
We are stricken by no plague of locusts.
Compared with the perils which our forefathers conquered, because they believed and were not afraid, we have still much to be thankful for.
Nature still offers her bounty and human efforts have multiplied it.
Plenty is at our doorstep, but a generous use of it languishes in the very sight of the supply.
Primarily, this is because the rulers of the exchange of mankind's goods have failed, through their own stubbornness and their own incompetence, have admitted their failure, and have abdicated.
Practices of the unscrupulous money changers stand indicted in the court of public opinion, rejected by the hearts and minds of men.
True, they have tried.
But their efforts have been cast in the pattern of an outworn tradition.
Faced by failure of credit, they have proposed only the lending of more money.
Stripped of the lure of profit by which to induce our people to follow their false leadership, they have resorted to exhortations, pleading tearfully for restored confidence.
They only know the rules of a generation of self-seekers.
They have no vision, and when there is no vision the people perish.
Yes, the money changers have fled from their high seats in the temple of our civilization.
We may now restore that temple to the ancient truths.
The measure of that restoration lies in the extent to which we apply social values more noble than mere monetary profit.
Happiness lies not in the mere possession of money; it lies in the joy of achievement, in the thrill of creative effort.
The joy, the moral stimulation of work no longer must be forgotten in the mad chase of evanescent profits.
These dark days, my friends, will be worth all they cost us if they teach us that our true destiny is not to be ministered unto but to minister to ourselves, to our fellow men.
Recognition of that falsity of material wealth as the standard of success goes hand in hand with the abandonment of the false belief that public office and high political position are to be valued only by the standards of pride of place and personal profit; and there must be an end to a conduct in banking and in business which too often has given to a sacred trust the likeness of callous and selfish wrongdoing.
Small wonder that confidence languishes, for it thrives only on honesty, on honor, on the sacredness of obligations, on faithful protection, and on unselfish performance; without them it cannot live.
Restoration calls, however, not for changes in ethics alone.
This Nation is asking for action, and action now.
Our greatest primary task is to put people to work.
This is no unsolvable problem if we face it wisely and courageously.
It can be accomplished in part by direct recruiting by the Government itself, treating the task as we would treat the emergency of a war, but at the same time, through this employment, accomplishing great -- greatly needed projects to stimulate and reorganize the use of our great natural resources.
Hand in hand with that we must frankly recognize the overbalance of population in our industrial centers and, by engaging on a national scale in a redistribution, endeavor to provide a better use of the land for those best fitted for the land.
Yes, the task can be helped by definite efforts to raise the values of agricultural products, and with this the power to purchase the output of our cities.
It can be helped by preventing realistically the tragedy of the growing loss through foreclosure of our small homes and our farms.
It can be helped by insistence that the Federal, the State, and the local governments act forthwith on the demand that their cost be drastically reduced.
It can be helped by the unifying of relief activities which today are often scattered, uneconomical, unequal.
It can be helped by national planning for and supervision of all forms of transportation and of communications and other utilities that have a definitely public character.
There are many ways in which it can be helped, but it can never be helped by merely talking about it.
We must act.
We must act quickly.
   And finally, in our progress towards a resumption of work, we require two safeguards against a return of the evils of the old order.
There must be a strict supervision of all banking and credits and investments.
There must be an end to speculation with other people's money.
And there must be provision for an adequate but sound currency.
These, my friends, are the lines of attack.
I shall presently urge upon a new Congress in special session detailed measures for their fulfillment, and I shall seek the immediate assistance of the 48 States.
Through this program of action we address ourselves to putting our own national house in order and making income balance outgo.
Our international trade relations, though vastly important, are in point of time, and necessity, secondary to the establishment of a sound national economy.
I favor, as a practical policy, the putting of first things first.
I shall spare no effort to restore world trade by international economic readjustment; but the emergency at home cannot wait on that accomplishment.
The basic thought that guides these specific means of national recovery is not nationally -- narrowly nationalistic.
It is the insistence, as a first consideration, upon the interdependence of the various elements in and parts of the United States of America -- a recognition of the old and permanently important manifestation of the American spirit of the pioneer.
It is the way to recovery.
It is the immediate way.
It is the strongest assurance that recovery will endure.
In the field of world policy, I would dedicate this Nation to the policy of the good neighbor: the neighbor who resolutely respects himself and, because he does so, respects the rights of others; the neighbor who respects his obligations and respects the sanctity of his agreements in and with a world of neighbors.
If I read the temper of our people correctly, we now realize, as we have never realized before, our interdependence on each other; that we can not merely take, but we must give as well; that if we are to go forward, we must move as a trained and loyal army willing to sacrifice for the good of a common discipline, because without such discipline no progress can be made, no leadership becomes effective.
We are, I know, ready and willing to submit our lives and our property to such discipline, because it makes possible a leadership which aims at the larger good.
This, I propose to offer, pledging that the larger purposes will bind upon us, bind upon us all as a sacred obligation with a unity of duty hitherto evoked only in times of armed strife.
With this pledge taken, I assume unhesitatingly the leadership of this great army of our people dedicated to a disciplined attack upon our common problems.
Action in this image, action to this end is feasible under the form of government which we have inherited from our ancestors.
Our Constitution is so simple, so practical that it is possible always to meet extraordinary needs by changes in emphasis and arrangement without loss of essential form.
That is why our constitutional system has proved itself the most superbly enduring political mechanism the modern world has ever seen.
It has met every stress of vast expansion of territory, of foreign wars, of bitter internal strife, of world relations.
And it is to be hoped that the normal balance of executive and legislative authority may be wholly equal, wholly adequate to meet the unprecedented task before us.
But it may be that an unprecedented demand and need for undelayed action may call for temporary departure from that normal balance of public procedure.
I am prepared under my constitutional duty to recommend the measures that a stricken nation in the midst of a stricken world may require.
These measures, or such other measures as the Congress may build out of its experience and wisdom, I shall seek, within my constitutional authority, to bring to speedy adoption.
But, in the event that the Congress shall fail to take one of these two courses, in the event that the national emergency is still critical, I shall not evade the clear course of duty that will then confront me.
I shall ask the Congress for the one remaining instrument to meet the crisis -- broad Executive power to wage a war against the emergency, as great as the power that would be given to me if we were in fact invaded by a foreign foe.
For the trust reposed in me, I will return the courage and the devotion that befit the time.
I can do no less.
We face the arduous days that lie before us in the warm courage of national unity; with the clear consciousness of seeking old and precious moral values; with the clean satisfaction that comes from the stern performance of duty by old and young alike.
We aim at the assurance of a rounded, a permanent national life.
We do not distrust the -- the future of essential democracy.
The people of the United States have not failed.
In their need they have registered a mandate that they want direct, vigorous action.
They have asked for discipline and direction under leadership.
They have made me the present instrument of their wishes.
In the spirit of the gift I take it.
In this dedication -- In this dedication of a Nation, we humbly ask the blessing of God.
May He protect each and every one of us.
May He guide me in the days to come.
Mr.
Vice President, Mr.
Speaker, Members of the Senate, and of the House of Representatives:Yesterday, December 7th, 1941 -- a date which will live in infamy -- the United States of America was suddenly and deliberately attacked by naval and air forces of the Empire of Japan.
The United States was at peace with that nation and, at the solicitation of Japan, was still in conversation with its government and its emperor looking toward the maintenance of peace in the Pacific.
Indeed, one hour after Japanese air squadrons had commenced bombing in the American island of Oahu, the Japanese ambassador to the United States and his colleague delivered to our Secretary of State a formal reply to a recent American message.
And while this reply stated that it seemed useless to continue the existing diplomatic negotiations, it contained no threat or hint of war or of armed attack.
It will be recorded that the distance of Hawaii from Japan makes it obvious that the attack was deliberately planned many days or even weeks ago.
During the intervening time, the Japanese government has deliberately sought to deceive the United States by false statements and expressions of hope for continued peace.
The attack yesterday on the Hawaiian islands has caused severe damage to American naval and military forces.
I regret to tell you that very many American lives have been lost.
In addition, American ships have been reported torpedoed on the high seas between San Francisco and Honolulu.
Yesterday, the Japanese government also launched an attack against Malaya.
Last night, Japanese forces attacked Hong Kong.
Last night, Japanese forces attacked Guam.
Last night, Japanese forces attacked the Philippine Islands.
Last night, the Japanese attacked Wake Island.
And this morning, the Japanese attacked Midway Island.
Japan has, therefore, undertaken a surprise offensive extending throughout the Pacific area.
The facts of yesterday and today speak for themselves.
The people of the United States have already formed their opinions and well understand the implications to the very life and safety of our nation.
As Commander in Chief of the Army and Navy, I have directed that all measures be taken for our defense.
But always will our whole nation remember the character of the onslaught against us.
No matter how long it may take us to overcome this premeditated invasion, the American people in their righteous might will win through to absolute victory.
I believe that I interpret the will of the Congress and of the people when I assert that we will not only defend ourselves to the uttermost, but will make it very certain that this form of treachery shall never again endanger us.
Hostilities exist.
There is no blinking at the fact that our people, our territory, and our interests are in grave danger.
With confidence in our armed forces, with the unbounding determination of our people, we will gain the inevitable triumph -- so help us God.
I ask that the Congress declare that since the unprovoked and dastardly attack by Japan on Sunday, December 7th, 1941, a state of war has existed between the United States and the Japanese empire.
Thank you ladies and gentlemen for a very warm reception.
It was one hundred and forty-four years ago that members of the Democratic Party first met in convention to select a Presidential candidate.
Since that time, Democrats have continued to convene once every four years and draft a party platform and nominate a Presidential candidate.
And our meeting this week is a continuation of that tradition.
But there is something different about tonight.
There is something special about tonight.
What is different? What is special?I, Barbara Jordan, am a keynote speaker.
When -- A lot of years passed since 1832, and during that time it would have been most unusual for any national political party to ask a Barbara Jordan to deliver a keynote address.
But tonight, here I am.
And I feel -- I feel that notwithstanding the past that my presence here is one additional bit of evidence that the American Dream need not forever be deferred.
Now -- Now that I have this grand distinction, what in the world am I supposed to say? I could easily spend this time praising the accomplishments of this party and attacking the Republicans -- but I don't choose to do that.
I could list the many problems which Americans have.
I could list the problems which cause people to feel cynical, angry, frustrated: problems which include lack of integrity in government; the feeling that the individual no longer counts; the reality of material and spiritual poverty; the feeling that the grand American experiment is failing or has failed.
I could recite these problems, and then I could sit down and offer no solutions.
But I don't choose to do that either.
The citizens of America expect more.
They deserve and they want more than a recital of problems.
We are a people in a quandary about the present.
We are a people in search of our future.
We are a people in search of a national community.
We are a people trying not only to solve the problems of the present, unemployment, inflation, but we are attempting on a larger scale to fulfill the promise of America.
We are attempting to fulfill our national purpose, to create and sustain a society in which all of us are equal.
Throughout -- Throughout our history, when people have looked for new ways to solve their problems and to uphold the principles of this nation, many times they have turned to political parties.
They have often turned to the Democratic Party.
What is it? What is it about the Democratic Party that makes it the instrument the people use when they search for ways to shape their future? Well I believe the answer to that question lies in our concept of governing.
Our concept of governing is derived from our view of people.
It is a concept deeply rooted in a set of beliefs firmly etched in the national conscience of all of us.
Now what are these beliefs? First, we believe in equality for all and privileges for none.
This is a belief -- This is a belief that each American, regardless of background, has equal standing in the public forum -- all of us.
Because -- Because we believe this idea so firmly, we are an inclusive rather than an exclusive party.
Let everybody come.
I think it no accident that most of those immigrating to America in the 19th century identified with the Democratic Party.
We are a heterogeneous party made up of Americans of diverse backgrounds.
We believe that the people are the source of all governmental power; that the authority of the people is to be extended, not restricted.
This -- This can be accomplished only by providing each citizen with every opportunity to participate in the management of the government.
They must have that, we believe.
We believe that the government which represents the authority of all the people, not just one interest group, but all the people, has an obligation to actively -- underscore actively -- seek to remove those obstacles which would block individual achievement -- obstacles emanating from race, sex, economic condition.
The government must remove them, seek to remove them.
We -- We are a party -- We are a party of innovation.
We do not reject our traditions, but we are willing to adapt to changing circumstances, when change we must.
We are willing to suffer the discomfort of change in order to achieve a better future.
We have a positive vision of the future founded on the belief that the gap between the promise and reality of America can one day be finally closed.
We believe that.
This, my friends is the bedrock of our concept of governing.
This is a part of the reason why Americans have turned to the Democratic Party.
These are the foundations upon which a national community can be built.
Let all understand that these guiding principles cannot be discarded for short-term political gains.
They represent what this country is all about.
They are indigenous to the American idea.
And these are principles which are not negotiable.
In other times -- In other times, I could stand here and give this kind of exposition on the beliefs of the Democratic Party and that would be enough.
But today that is not enough.
People want more.
That is not sufficient reason for the majority of the people of this country to decide to vote Democratic.
We have made mistakes.
We realize that.
We admit our mistakes.
In our haste to do all things for all people, we did not foresee the full consequences of our actions.
And when the people raised their voices, we didn't hear.
But our deafness was only a temporary condition, and not an irreversible condition.
Even as I stand here and admit that we have made mistakes, I still believe that as the people of America sit in judgment on each party, they will recognize that our mistakes were mistakes of the heart.
They'll recognize that.
And now -- now we must look to the future.
Let us heed the voice of the people and recognize their common sense.
If we do not, we not only blaspheme our political heritage, we ignore the common ties that bind all Americans.
Many fear the future.
Many are distrustful of their leaders, and believe that their voices are never heard.
Many seek only to satisfy their private work -- wants; to satisfy their private interests.
But this is the great danger America faces -- that we will cease to be one nation and become instead a collection of interest groups: city against suburb, region against region, individual against individual; each seeking to satisfy private wants.
If that happens, who then will speak for America? Who then will speak for the common good?This is the question which must be answered in 1976: Are we to be one people bound together by common spirit, sharing in a common endeavor; or will we become a divided nation? For all of its uncertainty, we cannot flee the future.
We must not become the "New Puritans" and reject our society.
We must address and master the future together.
It can be done if we restore the belief that we share a sense of national community, that we share a common national endeavor.
It can be done.
There is no executive order; there is no law that can require the American people to form a national community.
This we must do as individuals, and if we do it as individuals, there is no President of the United States who can veto that decision.
As a first step -- As a first step, we must restore our belief in ourselves.
We are a generous people, so why can't we be generous with each other? We need to take to heart the words spoken by Thomas Jefferson:Let us restore the social intercourse -- "Let us restore to social intercourse that harmony and that affection without which liberty and even life are but dreary things.
A nation is formed by the willingness of each of us to share in the responsibility for upholding the common good.
A government is invigorated when each one of us is willing to participate in shaping the future of this nation.
In this election year, we must define the "common good" and begin again to shape a common future.
Let each person do his or her part.
If one citizen is unwilling to participate, all of us are going to suffer.
For the American idea, though it is shared by all of us, is realized in each one of us.
And now, what are those of us who are elected public officials supposed to do? We call ourselves "public servants" but I'll tell you this: We as public servants must set an example for the rest of the nation.
It is hypocritical for the public official to admonish and exhort the people to uphold the common good if we are derelict in upholding the common good.
More is required -- More is required of public officials than slogans and handshakes and press releases.
More is required.
We must hold ourselves strictly accountable.
We must provide the people with a vision of the future.
If we promise as public officials, we must deliver.
If -- If we as public officials propose, we must produce.
If we say to the American people, "It is time for you to be sacrificial" -- sacrifice.
If the public official says that, we [public officials] must be the first to give.
We must be.
And again, if we make mistakes, we must be willing to admit them.
We have to do that.
What we have to do is strike a balance between the idea that government should do everything and the idea, the belief, that government ought to do nothing.
Strike a balance.
Let there be no illusions about the difficulty of forming this kind of a national community.
It's tough, difficult, not easy.
But a spirit of harmony will survive in America only if each of us remembers that we share a common destiny; if each of us remembers, when self-interest and bitterness seem to prevail, that we share a common destiny.
I have confidence that we can form this kind of national community.
I have confidence that the Democratic Party can lead the way.
I have that confidence.
We cannot improve on the system of government handed down to us by the founders of the Republic.
There is no way to improve upon that.
But what we can do is to find new ways to implement that system and realize our destiny.
Now I began this speech by commenting to you on the uniqueness of a Barbara Jordan making a keynote address.
Well I am going to close my speech by quoting a Republican President and I ask you that as you listen to these words of Abraham Lincoln, relate them to the concept of a national community in which every last one of us participates:"As I would not be a slave, so I would not be a master.
 This -- This -- "This expresses my idea of Democracy.
Whatever differs from this, to the extent of the difference, is no Democracy.
Thank you.
My Fellow Americans,I come before you tonight as a candidate for the Vice Presidency and as a man whose honesty and -- and integrity has been questioned.
Now, the usual political thing to do when charges are made against you is to either ignore them or to deny them without giving details.
I believe we've had enough of that in the United States, particularly with the present Administration in Washington, D.
.
To me the office of the Vice Presidency of the United States is a great office, and I feel that the people have got to have confidence in the integrity of the men who run for that office and who might obtain it.
I have a theory, too, that the best and only answer to a smear or to an honest misunderstanding of the facts is to tell the truth.
And that's why I'm here tonight.
I want to tell you my side of the case.
I'm sure that you have read the charge, and you've heard it, that I, Senator Nixon, took 18,000 dollars from a group of my supporters.
Now, was that wrong? And let me say that it was wrong.
I'm saying, incidentally, that it was wrong, not just illegal, because it isn't a question of whether it was legal or illegal, that isn't enough.
The question is, was it morally wrong? I say that it was morally wrong -- if any of that 18,000 dollars went to Senator Nixon, for my personal use.
I say that it was morally wrong if it was secretly given and secretly handled.
And I say that it was morally wrong if any of the contributors got special favors for the contributions that they made.
And now to answer those questions let me say this: Not one cent of the 18,000 dollars or any other money of that type ever went to me for my personal use.
Every penny of it was used to pay for political expenses that I did not think should be charged to the taxpayers of the United States.
 It was not a secret fund.
As a matter of  fact, when I was on "Meet the Press" -- some of you may have seen it last Sunday -- Peter Edson came up to me after the program, and he said, "Dick, what about this "fund" we hear about?" And I said, "Well, there's no secret about it.
Go out and see Dana Smith who was the administrator of the fund.
 And I gave him [Edson] his [Smith's] address.
And I said you will find that the purpose of the fund simply was to defray political expenses that I did not feel should be charged to the Government.
And third, let me point out -- and I want to make this particularly clear -- that no contributor to this fund, no contributor to any of my campaigns, has ever received any consideration that he would not have received as an ordinary constituent.
I just don't believe in that, and I can say that never, while I have been in the Senate of the United States, as far as the people that contributed to this fund are concerned, have I made a telephone call for them to an agency, or have I gone down to an agency in their behalf.
And the records will show that, the records which are in the hands of the administration.
Well, then, some of you will say, and rightly, "Well, what did you use the fund for, Senator?" "Why did you have to have it?" Let me tell you in just a word how a Senate office operates.
First of all, a Senator gets 15,000 dollars a year in salary.
He gets enough money to pay for one trip a year -- a round trip, that is -- for himself and his family between his home and Washington, D.
.
And then he gets an allowance to handle the people that work in his office to handle his mail.
And the allowance for my State of California is enough to hire 13 people.
And let me say, incidentally, that that allowance is not paid to the Senator.
It's paid directly to the individuals that the Senator puts on his pay roll.
But all of these people and all of these allowances are for strictly official business; business, for example, when a constituent writes in and wants you to go down to the Veteran's Administration and get some information about his GI policy -- items of that type, for example.
But there are other expenses which are not covered by the Government.
And I think I can best discuss those expenses by asking you some questions.
Do you think that when I or any other Senator makes a political speech, has it printed, should charge the printing of that speech and the mailing of that speech to the taxpayers? Do you think, for example, when I or any other Senator makes a trip to his home State to make a purely political speech that the cost of that trip should be charged to the taxpayers? Do you think when a Senator makes political broadcasts or political television broadcasts, radio or television, that the expense of those broadcasts should be charged to the taxpayers? Well I know what your answer is.
It's the same answer that audiences give me whenever I discuss this particular problem: The answer is no.
The taxpayers shouldn't be required to finance items which are not official business but which are primarily political business.
Well, then the question arises, you say, "Well, how do you pay for these and how can you do it legally?" And there are several ways that it can be done, incidentally, and that it is done legally in the United States Senate and in the Congress.
The first way is to be a rich man.
I don't happen to be a rich man, so I couldn't use that one.
Another way that is used is to put your wife on the pay roll.
Let me say, incidentally, that my opponent, my opposite number for the Vice Presidency on the Democratic ticket, does have his wife on the pay roll and has had it -- her on his pay roll for the ten years -- for the past ten years.
Now just let me say this: That's his business, and I'm not critical of him for doing that.
You will have to pass judgment on that particular point.
But I have never done that for this reason: I have found that there are so many deserving stenographers and secretaries in Washington that needed the work that I just didn't feel it was right to put my wife on the pay roll.
My wife's sitting over here.
She's a wonderful stenographer.
She used to teach stenography and she used to teach shorthand in high school.
That was when I met her.
And I can tell you folks that she's worked many hours at night and many hours on Saturdays and Sundays in my office, and she's done a fine job, and I am proud to say tonight that in the six years I've been in the House and the Senate of the United States, Pat Nixon has never been on the Government pay roll.
What are other ways that these finances can be taken care of? Some who are lawyers, and I happen to be a lawyer, continue to practice law, but I haven't been able to do that.
I'm so far away from California that I've been so busy with my senatorial work that I have not engaged in any legal practice.
And, also, as far as law practice is concerned, it seemed to me that the relationship between an attorney and the client was so personal that you couldn't possibly represent a man as an attorney and then have an unbiased view when he presented his case to you in the event that he had one before Government.
And so I felt that the best way to handle these necessary political expenses of getting my message to the American people and the speeches I made -- the speeches that I had printed for the most part concerned this one message of exposing this Administration, the Communism in it, the corruption in it -- the only way that I could do that was to accept the aid which people in my home State of California, who contributed to my campaign and who continued to make these contributions after I was elected, were glad to make.
And let me say I'm proud of the fact that not one of them has ever asked me for a special favor.
I'm proud of the fact that not one of them has ever asked me to vote on a bill other than of my own conscience would dictate.
And I am proud of the fact that the taxpayers, by subterfuge or otherwise, have never paid one dime for expenses which I thought were political and shouldn't be charged to the taxpayers.
Let me say, incidentally, that some of you may say, "Well, that's all right, Senator, that's your explanation, but have you got any proof?" And I'd like to tell you this evening that just an hour ago we received an independent audit of this entire fund.
I suggested to Governor Sherman Adams, who is the Chief of Staff of the Dwight Eisenhower campaign, that an independent audit and legal report be obtained, and I have that audit here in my hands.
It's an audit made by the Price Waterhouse & Company firm, and the legal opinion by Gibson, Dunn, & Crutcher, lawyers in Los Angeles, the biggest law firm, and incidentally, one of the best ones in Los Angeles.
I am proud to be able to report to you tonight that this audit and this legal opinion is being forwarded to General Eisenhower.
And I'd like to read to you the opinion that was prepared by Gibson, Dunn, & Crutcher, and based on all the pertinent laws and statutes, together with the audit report prepared by the certified public accountants.
Quote:It is our conclusion that Senator Nixon did not obtain any financial gain from the collection and disbursement of the fund by Dana Smith; that Senator Nixon did not violate any federal or state law by reason of the operation of the fund; and that neither the portion of the fund paid by Dana Smith directly to third persons, nor the portion paid to Senator Nixon, to reimburse him for designated office expenses, constituted income to the Senator which was either reportable or taxable as income under applicable tax laws.
          (signed)          Gibson, Dunn, & Crutcher,          by Elmo H.
ConleyNow that, my friends, is not Nixon speaking, but that's an independent audit which was requested, because I want the American people to know all the facts, and I am not afraid of having independent people go in and check the facts, and that is exactly what they did.
But then I realized that there are still some who may say, and rightfully so -- and let me say that I recognize that some will continue to smear regardless of what the truth may be -- but that there has been, understandably, some honest misunderstanding on this matter, and there are some that will say, "Well, maybe you were able, Senator, to fake this thing.
How can we believe what you say? After all, is there a possibility that maybe you got some sums in cash? Is there a possibility that you may have feathered your own nest?" And so now, what I am going to do -- and incidentally this is unprecedented in the history of American politics -- I am going at this time to give to this television and radio audio -- audience, a complete financial history, everything I've earned, everything I've spent, everything I own.
And I want you to know the facts.
I'll have to start early.
I was born in 1913.
Our family was one of modest circumstances, and most of my early life was spent in a store out in East Whittier.
It was a grocery store, one of those family enterprises.
The only reason we were able to make it go was because my mother and dad had five boys, and we all worked in the store.
I worked my way through college, and, to a great extent, through law school.
And then in 1940, probably the best thing that ever happened to me happened.
I married Pat who's sitting over here.
We had a rather difficult time after we were married, like so many of the young couples who may be listening to us.
I practiced law.
She continued to teach school.
Then, in 1942, I went into the service.
Let me say that my service record was not a particularly unusual one.
I went to the South Pacific.
I guess I'm entitled to a couple of battle stars.
I got a couple of letters of commendation.
But I was just there when the bombs were falling.
And then I returned -- returned to the United States, and in 1946, I ran for the Congress.
When we came out of the war -- Pat and I -- Pat during the war had worked as a stenographer, and in a bank, and as an economist for a Government agency -- and when we came out, the total of our savings, from both my law practice, her teaching and all the time that I was in the war, the total for that entire period was just a little less than 10,000 dollars.
Every cent of that, incidentally, was in Government bonds.
Well that's where we start, when I go into politics.
Now, what have I earned since I went into politics? Well, here it is.
I've jotted it down.
Let me read the notes.
First of all, I've had my salary as a Congressman and as a Senator.
Second, I have received a total in this past six years of 1600 dollars from estates which were in my law firm at the time that I severed my connection with it.
And, incidentally, as I said before, I have not engaged in any legal practice and have not accepted any fees from business that came into the firm after I went into politics.
I have made an average of approximately 1500 dollars a year from nonpolitical speaking engagements and lectures.
And then, fortunately, we've inherited a little money.
Pat sold her interest in her father's estate for 3,000 dollars, and I inherited 1500 dollars from my grandfather.
We lived rather modestly.
For four years we lived in an apartment in Parkfairfax, in Alexandria, Virginia.
The rent was 80 dollars a month.
And we saved for the time that we could buy a house.
Now, that was what we took in.
What did we do with this money? What do we have today to show for it? This will surprise you because it is so little, I suppose, as standards generally go of people in public life.
First of all, we've got a house in Washington, which cost 41,000 dollars and on which we owe 20,000 dollars.
We have a house in Whittier, California which cost 13,000 dollars and on which we owe 3000 dollars.
My folks are living there at the present time.
I have just 4000 dollars in life insurance, plus my GI policy which I've never been able to convert, and which will run out in two years.
I have no life insurance whatever on Pat.
I have no life insurance on our two youngsters, Tricia and Julie.
I own a 1950 Oldsmobile car.
We have our furniture.
We have no stocks and bonds of any type.
We have no interest of any kind, direct or indirect, in any business.
Now, that's what we have.
What do we owe?Well in addition to the mortgage, the 20,000 dollar mortgage on the house in Washington, the 10,000 dollar one on the house in Whittier, I owe 4500 dollars to the Riggs Bank in Washington, D.
.
 with interest 4 and 1/2 percent.
I owe 3500 dollars to my parents, and the interest on that loan, which I pay regularly, because it's the part of the savings they made through the years they were working so hard -- I pay regularly 4 percent interest.
And then I have a 500 dollar loan, which I have on my life insurance.
Well, that's about it.
That's what we have.
And that's what we owe.
It isn't very much.
But Pat and I have the satisfaction that every dime that we've got is honestly ours.
I should say this, that Pat doesn't have a mink coat.
But she does have a respectable Republican cloth coat, and I always tell her she'd look good in anything.
One other thing I probably should tell you, because if I don't they'll probably be saying this about me, too.
We did get something, a gift, after the election.
A man down in Texas heard Pat on the radio mention the fact that our two youngsters would like to have a dog.
And believe it or not, the day before we left on this campaign trip we got a message from Union Station in Baltimore, saying they had a package for us.
We went down to get it.
You know what it was? It was a little cocker spaniel dog in a crate that he'd sent all the way from Texas, black and white, spotted.
And our little girl Tricia, the six year old, named it "Checkers.
 And you know, the kids, like all kids, love the dog, and I just want to say this, right now, that regardless of what they say about it, we're gonna keep it.
It isn't easy to come before a nationwide audience and bare your life, as I've done.
But I want to say some things before I conclude that I think most of you will agree on.
Mr.
Mitchell, the Chairman of the Democratic National Committee, made this statement -- that if a man couldn't afford to be in the United States Senate, he shouldn't run for the Senate.
And I just want to make my position clear.
I don't agree with Mr.
Mitchell when he says that only a rich man should serve his Government in the United States Senate or in the Congress.
I don't believe that represents the thinking of the Democratic Party, and I know that it doesn't represent the thinking of the Republican Party.
I believe that it's fine that a man like Governor Stevenson, who inherited a fortune from his father, can run for President.
But I also feel that it's essential in this country of ours that a man of modest means can also run for President, because, you know, remember Abraham Lincoln, you remember what he said: "God must have loved the common people -- he made so many of them.
And now I'm going to suggest some courses of conduct.
First of all, you have read in the papers about other funds, now.
Mr.
Stevenson apparently had a couple -- one of them in which a group of business people paid and helped to supplement the salaries of State employees.
Here is where the money went directly into their pockets, and I think that what Mr.
Stevenson should do should be to come before the American people, as I have, give the names of the people that contributed to that fund, give the names of the people who put this money into their pockets at the same time that they were receiving money from their State government and see what favors, if any, they gave out for that.
I don't condemn Mr.
Stevenson for what he did, but until the facts are in there is a doubt that will be raised.
And as far as Mr.
Sparkman is concerned, I would suggest the same thing.
He's had his wife on the payroll.
I don't condemn him for that, but I think that he should come before the American people and indicate what outside sources of income he has had.
I would suggest that under the circumstances both Mr.
Sparkman and Mr.
Stevenson should come before the American people, as I have, and make a complete financial statement as to their financial history, and if they don't it will be an admission that they have something to hide.
And I think you will agree with me -- because, folks, remember, a man that's to be President of the United States, a man that's to be Vice President of the United States, must have the confidence of all the people.
And that's why I'm doing what I'm doing.
And that's why I suggest that Mr.
Stevenson and Mr.
Sparkman, since they are under attack, should do what they're doing.
Now let me say this: I know that this is not the last of the smears.
In spite of my explanation tonight, other smears will be made.
Others have been made in the past.
And the purpose of the smears, I know, is this: to silence me; to make me let up.
Well, they just don't know who they're dealing with.
I'm going to tell you this: I remember in the dark days of the Hiss case some of the same columnists, some of the same radio commentators who are attacking me now and misrepresenting my position, were violently opposing me at the time I was after Alger Hiss.
But I continued to fight because I knew I was right, and I can say to this great television and radio audience that I have no apologies to the American people for my part in putting Alger Hiss where he is today.
And as far as this is concerned, I intend to continue to fight.
Why do I feel so deeply? Why do I feel that in spite of the smears, the misunderstanding, the necessity for a man to come up here and bare his soul as I have -- why is it necessary for me to continue this fight? And I want to tell you why.
Because, you see, I love my country.
And I think my country is in danger.
And I think the only man that can save America at this time is the man that's running for President, on my ticket -- Dwight Eisenhower.
You say, "Why do I think it is in danger?" And I say, look at the record.
Seven years of the Truman-Acheson Administration, and what's happened? Six hundred million people lost to the Communists.
And a war in Korea in which we have lost 117,000 American casualties, and I say to all of you that a policy that results in the loss of 600 million people to the Communists, and a war which cost us 117,000 American casualties isn't good enough for America.
And I say that those in the State Department that made the mistakes which caused that war and which resulted in those losses should be kicked out of the State Department just as fast as we get them out of there.
And let me say that I know Mr.
Stevenson won't do that because he defends the Truman policy, and I know that Dwight Eisenhower will do that, and that he will give America the leadership that it needs.
Take the problem of corruption.
You've read about the mess in Washington.
Mr.
Stevenson can't clean it up because he was picked by the man, Truman, under whose Administration the mess was made.
You wouldn't trust the man who made the mess to clean it up.
That's Truman.
And by the same token you can't trust the man who was picked by the man that made the mess to clean it up -- and that's Stevenson.
And so I say, Eisenhower, who owed nothing to Truman, nothing to the big city bosses -- he is the man that can clean up the mess in Washington.
Take Communism.
I say that as far as that subject is concerned the danger is great to America.
In the Hiss case they got the secrets which enabled them to break the American secret State Department code.
They got secrets in the atomic bomb case which enabled them to get the secret of the atomic bomb five years before they would have gotten it by their own devices.
And I say that any man who called the Alger Hiss case a red herring isn't fit to be President of the United States.
I say that a man who, like Mr.
Stevenson, has pooh-poohed and ridiculed the Communist threat in the United States -- he said that they are phantoms among ourselves.
He has accused us that have attempted to expose the Communists, of looking for Communists in the Bureau of Fisheries and Wildlife.
I say that a man who says that isn't qualified to be President of the United States.
And I say that the only man who can lead us in this fight to rid the Government of both those who are Communists and those who have corrupted this Government is Eisenhower, because Eisenhower, you can be sure, recognizes the problem, and he knows how to deal with it.
Now let me that finally, this evening, I want to read to you, just briefly, excerpts from a letter which I received, a letter which after all this is over no one can take away from us.
It reads as follows:Dear Senator Nixon,Since I am only 19 years of age, I can't vote in this presidential election, but believe me if I could you and General Eisenhower would certainly get my vote.
My husband is in the Fleet Marines in Korea.
He' a corpsman on the front lines and we have a two month old son he's never seen.
And I feel confident that with great Americans like you and General Eisenhower in the White House, lonely Americans like myself will be united with their loved ones now in Korea.
I only pray to God that you won't be too late.
Enclosed is a small check to help you in your campaign.
Living on $85 a month, it is all I can afford at present, but let me know what else I can do.
Folks, it's a check for 10 dollars, and it's one that I will never cash.
And just let me say this: We hear a lot about prosperity these days, but I say why can't we have prosperity built on peace, rather than prosperity built on war? Why can't we have prosperity and an honest Government in Washington, D.
.
 at the same time? Believe me, we can.
And Eisenhower is the man that can lead this crusade to bring us that kind of prosperity.
And now, finally, I know that you wonder whether or not I am going to stay on the Republican ticket or resign.
Let me say this: I don't believe that I ought to quit, because I am not a quitter.
And, incidentally, Pat's not a quitter.
After all, her name was Patricia Ryan and she was born on St.
Patrick's day, and you know the Irish never quit.
But the decision, my friends, is not mine.
I would do nothing that would harm the possibilities of Dwight Eisenhower to become President of the United States.
And for that reason I am submitting to the Republican National Committee tonight through this television broadcast the decision which it is theirs to make.
Let them decide whether my position on the ticket will help or hurt.
And I am going to ask you to help them decide.
Wire and write the Republican National Committee whether you think I should stay on or whether I should get off.
And whatever their decision is, I will abide by it.
But just let me say this last word: Regardless of what happens, I'm going to continue this fight.
I'm going to campaign up and down in America until we drive the crooks and the Communists and those that defend them out of Washington.
And remember folks, Eisenhower is a great man, believe me.
He's a great man.
And a vote for Eisenhower is a vote for what's good for America.
And what's good for America.
Mr.
Moderator, Rev.
Cleage, brothers and sisters and friends, and I see some enemies.
[laughter, applause] In fact, I think we'd be fooling ourselves if we had an audience this large and didn't realize that there were some enemies present.
This afternoon we want to talk about the ballot or the bullet.
The ballot or the bullet explains itself.
But before we get into it, since this is the year of the ballot or the bullet, I would like to clarify some things that refer to me personally, concerning my own personal position.
I'm still a Muslim.
That is, my religion is still Islam.
[applause] My religion is still Islam.
I still credit Mr.
Muhammad for what I know and what I am.
He's the one who opened my eyes.
[applause] At present I am the minister of the newly founded Muslim Mosque Incorporated, which has its offices in the Theresa Hotel right in the heart of Harlem, that's the black belt in New York City.
And when we realize that Adam Clayton Powell, is a Christian minister, he has Abyssinian Baptist Church, but at the same time he's more famous for his political struggling.
And Dr.
King is a Christian minister from Atlanta Georgia, or in Atlanta Georgia, but he's become more famous for being involved in the civil rights struggle.
There's another in New York, Rev.
Galamison, I don't know if you've heard of him out here, he's a Christian minister from Brooklyn, but has become famous for his fight against the segregated school system in Brooklyn.
Rev.
Cleage, right here, is a Christian minister, here in Detroit, he's head of the Freedom Now Party.
All of these are Christian ministers [applause] …all of these are Christian ministers but they don't come to us as Christian ministers, they come to us as fighters in some other category.
I am a Muslim minister.
The same as they are Christian ministers, I'm a Muslim minister.
And I don't believe in fighting today on any one front, but on all fronts.
[applause] In fact, I'm a Black Nationalist freedom fighter.
[applause] Islam is my religion but I believe my religion is my personal business.
[applause] It governs my personal life, my personal morals.
And my religious philosophy is personal between me and the God in whom I believe, just as the religious philosophy of these others is between them and the God in whom they believe.
And this is best this way.
Were we to come out here discussing religion, we'd have too many differences from the out start and we could never get together.
So today, though Islam is my religious philosophy, my political, economic and social philosophy is black nationalism.
You and I – [applause] As I say, if we bring up religion, we'll have differences, we'll have arguments, and we'll never be able to get together.
But if we keep our religion at home, keep our religion in the closet, keep our religion between ourselves and our God, but when we come out here we have a fight that's common to all of us against a enemy who is common to all of us.
[applause]The political philosophy of black nationalism only means that the black man should control the politics and the politicians in his own community.
The time when white people can come in our community and get us to vote for them so that they can be our political leaders and tell us what to do and what not to do is long gone.
[applause]By the same token, the time when that same white man, knowing that your eyes are too far open, can send another Negro in the community, and get you and me to support him, so that he can use him to lead us astray, those days are long gone too.
[applause]The political philosophy of black nationalism only means that if you and I are going to live in a black community – and that's where we're going to live, 'cause as soon as you move into one of their….
oon as you move out of the black community into their community, it's mixed for a period of time, but they're gone and you're right there all by yourself again.
[applause]We must, we must understand the politics of our community and we must know what politics is supposed to produce.
We must know what part politics play in our lives.
And until we become politically mature, we will always be misled, led astray, or deceived or maneuvered into supporting someone politically who doesn't have the good of our community at heart.
So the political philosophy of black nationalism only means that we will have to carry on a program, a political program, of reeducation – to open our people's eyes, make us become more politically conscious, politically mature.
And then, we will – whenever we are ready to cast our ballot, that ballot will be cast for a man of the community, who has the good of the community at heart.
[applause]The economic philosophy of black nationalism only means that we should own and operate and control the economy of our community.
You would never have found—you can't open up a black store in a white community.
White man won't even patronize you.
And he's not wrong.
He got sense enough to look out for himself.
It's you who don't have sense enough to look out for yourself.
[applause]The white man, the white man is too intelligent to let someone else come and gain control of the economy of his community.
But you will let anybody come in and control the economy of your community, control the housing, control the education, control the jobs, control the businesses, under the pretext that you want to integrate.
Nah, you're out of your mind.
[applause]The political … the economic philosophy of black nationalism only means that we have to become involved in a program of reeducation, to educate our people into the importance of knowing that when you spend your dollar out of the community in which you live, the community in which you spend your money becomes richer and richer, the community out of which you take your money becomes poorer and poorer.
And because these Negroes, who have been misled, misguided, are breaking their necks to take their money and spend it with the Man, the Man is becoming richer and richer, and you're becoming poorer and poorer.
And then what happens? The community in which you live becomes a slum.
It becomes a ghetto.
The conditions become rundown.
And then you have the audacity to complain about poor housing in a rundown community, while you're running down yourselves when you take your dollar out.
[applause]And you and I are in a double trap because not only do we lose by taking our money someplace else and spending it, when we try and spend it in our own community we're trapped because we haven't had sense enough to set up stores and control the businesses of our community.
The man who is controlling the stores in our community is a man who doesn't look like we do.
He's a man who doesn't even live in the community.
So you and I, even when we try and spend our money on the block where we live or the area where we live, we're spending it with a man who, when the sun goes down, takes that basket full of money in another part of the town.
[applause]So we're trapped, trapped, double-trapped, triple-trapped.
Any way we go, we find that we're trapped.
Any every kind of solution that someone comes up with is just another trap.
But the political and economic philosophy of black nationalism…the economic philosophy of black nationalism shows our people the importance of setting up these little stores, and developing them and expanding them into larger operations.
Woolworth didn't start out big like they are today; they started out with a dime store, and expanded, and expanded, and expanded until today they are all over the country and all over the world and they getting some of everybody's money.
Now this is what you and I – General Motors, the same way, it didn't start out like it is.
It started out just a little rat-race type operation.
And it expanded and it expanded until today it's where it is right now.
And you and I have to make a start.
And the best place to start is right in the community where we live.
[applause]So our people not only have to be reeducated to the importance of supporting black business, but the black man himself has to be made aware of the importance of going into business.
And once you and I go into business, we own and operate at least the businesses in our community.
What we will be doing is developing a situation, wherein, we will actually be able to create employment for the people in the community.
And once you can create some employment in the community where you live, it will eliminate the necessity of you and me having to act ignorantly and disgracefully, boycotting and picketing some cracker someplace else trying to beg him for a job.
[applause]Anytime you have to rely upon your enemy for a job, you're in bad shape.
[applause] When you — and he is your enemy.
You wouldn't be in this country if some enemy hadn't kidnapped you and brought you here.
[applause] On the other hand, some of you think you came here on the Mayflower.
[laughter]So as you can see, brothers and sisters, today – this afternoon it is not our intention to discuss religion.
We're going to forget religion.
If we bring up religion we'll be in an argument.
And the best way to keep away from arguments and differences, as I said earlier, put your religion at home, in the closet, keep it between you and your God.
Because if it hasn't done anything more for you than it has, you need to forget it anyway.
[laughter, applause]Whether you are a Christian or a Muslim or a nationalist, we all have the same problem.
They don't hang you because you're a Baptist; they hang you 'cause you're black.
[applause] They don't attack me because I'm a Muslim.
They attack me 'cause I'm black.
They attacked all of us for the same reason.
All of us catch hell from the same enemy.
We're all in the same bag, in the same boat.
We suffer political oppression, economic exploitation and social degradation.
All of 'em from the same enemy.
The government has failed us.
You can't deny that.
Any time you're living in the 20th century, 1964, and you walking around here singing "We Shall Overcome," the government has failed you.
[applause] This is part of what's wrong with you, you do too much singing.
[laughter] Today it's time to stop singing and start swinging.
[laughter, applause]You can't sing up on freedom.
But you can swing up on some freedom.
[cheering] Cassius Clay can sing.
But singing didn't help him to become the heavyweight champion of the world.
Swinging helped him.
[applause]So this government has failed us.
The government itself has failed us.
And the white liberals who have been posing as our friends have failed us.
And once we see that all of these other sources to which we've turned have failed, we stop turning to them and turn to ourselves.
We need a self-help program, a do-it-yourself philosophy, a do-it-right-now philosophy, a it's-already-too-late philosophy.
This is what you and I need to get with.
And the only time – the only way we're going to solve our problem is with a self-help program.
Before we can get a self-help program started, we have to have a self-help philosophy.
Black nationalism is a self-help philosophy.
What's so good about it – you can stay right in the church where you are and still take black nationalism as your philosophy.
You can stay in any kind of civic organization that you belong to and still take black nationalism as your philosophy.
You can be an atheist and still take black nationalism as your philosophy.
This is a philosophy that eliminates the necessity for division and argument, 'cause if you're black, you should be thinking black.
And if you're black and you not thinking black at this late date, well, I'm sorry for you.
[applause]Once you change your philosophy, you change your thought pattern.
Once you change your thought pattern you change your attitude.
Once you change your attitude it changes your behavior pattern.
And then you go on into some action.
As long as you got a sit-down philosophy you'll have a sit-down thought pattern.
And as long as you think that old sit-down thought, you'll be in some kind of sit-down action.
They'll have you sitting in everywhere.
[laughter]It's not so good to refer to what you're going to do as a sit-in.
That right there castrates you.
Right there it brings you down.
What goes with it? What – think of the image of someone sitting.
An old woman can sit.
An old man can sit.
A chump can sit, a coward can sit, anything can sit.
Well, you and I been sitting long enough and it's time for us today to start doing some standing and some fighting to back that up.
[applause]When we look at other parts of this Earth upon which we live, we find that black, brown, red and yellow people in Africa and Asia are getting their independence.
They're not getting it by singing, 'We Shall Overcome.
 No, they're getting it through nationalism.
It is nationalism that brought about the independence of the people in Asia.
Every nation in Asia gained its independence through the philosophy of nationalism.
Every nation on the African continent that has gotten its independence brought it about through the philosophy of nationalism.
And it will take black nationalism to bring about the freedom of 22 million Afro-Americans, here in this country, where we have suffered colonialism for the past 400 years.
[applause]America is just as much a colonial power as England ever was.
America is just as much a colonial power as France ever was.
In fact, America is more so a colonial power than they, because she is a hypocritical colonial power behind it.
[applause] What is 20th — what, what do you call second-class citizenship? Why, that's colonization.
Second-class citizenship is nothing but 20th slavery.

How you gonna to tell me you're a second-class citizen? They don't have second-class citizenship in any other government on this Earth.
They just have slaves and people who are free! Well, this country is a hypocrite! They try and make you think they set you free by calling you a second-class citizen.
No, you're nothing but a 20th century slave.
[applause]Just as it took nationalism to remove colonialism from Asia and Africa, it'll take black nationalism today to remove colonialism from the backs and the minds of twenty-two million Afro-Americans here in this country.
And 1964 looks like it might be the year of the ballot or the bullet.
[applause]Why does it look like it might be the year of the ballot or the bullet? Because Negroes have listened to the trickery and the lies and the false promises of the white man now for too long, and they're fed up.
They've become disenchanted.
They've become disillusioned.
They've become dissatisfied.
And all of this has built up frustrations in the black community that makes the black community throughout America today more explosive than all of the atomic bombs the Russians can ever invent.
Whenever you got a racial powder keg sitting in your lap, you're in more trouble than if you had an atomic powder keg sitting in your lap.
When a racial powder keg goes off, it doesn't care who it knocks out the way.
Understand this, it's dangerous.
And in 1964, this seems to be the year.
Because what can the white man use, now, to fool us? After he put down that March on Washington – and you see all through that now, he tricked you, had you marching down to Washington.
Had you marching back and forth between the feet of a dead man named Lincoln and another dead man named George Washington, singing, "We Shall Overcome.
 [applause]He made a chump out of you.
He made a fool out of you.
He made you think you were going somewhere and you end up going nowhere but between Lincoln and Washington.
[laughter]So today our people are disillusioned.
They've become disenchanted.
They've become dissatisfied.
And in their frustrations they want action.
And in 1964 you'll see this young black man, this new generation, asking for the ballot or the bullet.
That old Uncle Tom action is outdated.
The young generation don't want to hear anything about "the odds are against us.
 What do we care about odds? [applause]When this country here was first being founded, there were thirteen colonies.
The whites were colonized.
They were fed up with this taxation without representation.
So some of them stood up and said, "Liberty or death!" I went to a white school over here in Mason, Michigan.
The white man made the mistake of letting me read his history books.
[laughter] He made the mistake of teaching me that Patrick Henry was a patriot, and George Washington – wasn't nothing non-violent about ol' Pat, or George Washington.
"Liberty or death" is was what brought about the freedom of whites in this country from the English.
[applause]They didn't care about the odds.
Why, they faced the wrath of the entire British Empire.
And in those days, they used to say that the British Empire was so vast and so powerful that the sun would never set on it.
This is how big it was, yet these thirteen little scrawny states, tired of taxation without representation, tired of being exploited and oppressed and degraded, told that big British Empire, "Liberty or death.
 And here you have 22 million Afro-Americans, black people today, catching more hell than Patrick Henry ever saw.
[applause]And I'm here to tell you in case you don't know it – that you got a new, you got a new generation of black people in this country who don't care anything whatsoever about odds.
They don't want to hear you ol' Uncle Tom, handkerchief-heads talking about the odds.
No! [laughter, applause] This is a new generation.
If they're going to draft these young black men, and send them over to Korea or to South Vietnam to face 800 million Chinese… [laughter, applause] If you're not afraid of those odds, you shouldn't be afraid of these odds.
[applause]Why is America – why does this loom to be such an explosive political year? Because this is the year of politics.
This is the year when all of the white politicians are going to come into the Negro community.
You never see them until election time.
You can't find them until election time.
[applause] They're going to come in with false promises.
And as they make these false promises they're going to feed our frustrations, and this will only serve to make matters worse.
I'm no politician.
I'm not even a student of politics.
I'm not a Republican, nor a Democrat, nor an American – and got sense enough to know it.
[applause]I'm one of the 22 million black victims of the Democrats.
One of the 22 million black victims of the Republicans and one of the 22 million black victims of Americanism.
[applause] And when I speak, I don't speak as a Democrat or a Republican, nor an American.
I speak as a victim of America's so-called democracy.
You and I have never seen democracy – all we've seen is hypocrisy.
[applause]When we open our eyes today and look around America, we see America not through the eyes of someone who has enjoyed the fruits of Americanism.
We see America through the eyes of someone who has been the victim of Americanism.
We don't see any American dream.
We've experienced only the American nightmare.
We haven't benefited from America's democracy.
We've only suffered from America's hypocrisy.
And the generation that's coming up now can see it.
And are not afraid to say it.
If you go to jail, so what? If you're black, you were born in jail.
[applause]If you black you were born in jail, in the North as well as the South.
Stop talking about the South.
As long as you south of the Canadian border, you South.
[laughter, applause] Don't call Governor Wallace a Dixie governor, Romney is a Dixie Governor.
[applause]Twenty-two million black victims of Americanism are waking up and they are gaining a new political consciousness, becoming politically mature.
And as they become – develop this political maturity, they're able to see the recent trends in these political elections.
They see that the whites are so evenly divided that every time they vote, the race is so close they have to go back and count the votes all over again.
Which means that any block, any minority that has a block of votes that stick together is in a strategic position.
Either way you go, that's who gets it.
You're in a position to determine who'll go to the White House and who'll stay in the doghouse.
[laughter]You're the one who has that power.
You can keep Johnson in Washington D.
.
 or you can send him back to his Texas cotton patch.
[applause] You're the one who sent Kennedy to Washington.
You're the one who put the present Democratic administration in Washington, D.
.
The whites were evenly divided.
It was the fact that you threw 80 percent of your votes behind the Democrats that put the Democrats in the White House.
When you see this, you can see that the Negro vote is the key factor.
And despite the fact that you are in a position to be the determining factor, what do you get out of it? The Democrats have been in Washington, D.
.
only because of the Negro vote.
They've been down there four years.
And they're – all other legislation they wanted to bring up they've brought it up, and gotten it out of the way, and now they bring up you.
And now they bring up you! You put them first and they put you last.
Because you're a chump! [applause] A political chump.
In Washington, D.
.
 in the House of Representatives there are 257 who are Democrats.
Only 177 are Republican.
In the Senate there are 67 Democrats.
Only 33 are Republicans.
The party that you backed controls two-thirds of the House of Representatives and the Senate and still they can't keep their promise to you.
'Cause you're a chump.
[applause]Any time you throw your weight behind a political party that controls two-thirds of the government, and that party can't keep the promise that it made to you during election-time, and you're dumb enough to walk around continuing to identify yourself with that party, you're not only a chump but you're a traitor to your race.
[applause]What kind of alibi do come up with? They try and pass the buck to the Dixiecrats.
Now, back during the days when you were blind, deaf and dumb, ignorant, politically immature, naturally you went along with that.
But today, as your eyes come open, and you develop political maturity, you're able to see and think for yourself, and you can see that a Dixiecrat is nothing but a Democrat – in disguise.
[applause]You look at the structure of the government that controls this country, is controlled by 16 senatorial committees and 20 congressional committees.
Of the 16 senatorial committees that run the government, 10 of them are in the hands of southern segregationists.
Of the 20 congressional committees that run the government, 12 of them are in the hands of southern segregationists.
And they're going to tell you and me that the South lost the war? [laughter, applause]You, today, are in the hands of a government of segregationists.
Racists, white supremacists, who belong to the Democratic party but disguise themselves as Dixiecrats.
A Dixiecrat is nothing but a Democrat.
Whoever runs the Democrats is also the father of the Dixiecrats.
And the father of all of them is sitting in the White House.
[applause] I say, and I'll say it again, you got a president who's nothing but a southern segregationist [applause] from the state of Texas.
They'll lynch in Texas as quick as they'll lynch you in Mississippi.
Only in Texas they lynch you with a Texas accent, in Mississippi they lynch you with a Mississippi accent.
[cheering]The first thing the cracker does when he comes in power, he takes all the Negro leaders and invites them for coffee.
To show that he's all right.
And those Uncle Toms can't pass up the coffee.
[laughter, applause] They come away from the coffee table telling you and me that this man is all right [laughter].
'Cause he's from the South and since he's from the South he can deal with the South.
Look at the logic that they're using.
What about Eastland? He's from the South.
Why not make him the president? If Johnson is a good man 'cause he's from Texas, and being from Texas will enable him to deal with the South, Eastland can deal with the South better than Johnson! [laughter, applause]Oh, I say you been misled.
You been had.
You been took.
[laughter, applause] I was in Washington a couple of weeks ago while the senators were filibustering and I noticed in the back of the Senate a huge map, and on this map it showed the distribution of Negroes in America.
And surprisingly, the same senators that were involved in the filibuster were from the states where there were the most Negroes.
Why were they filibustering the civil rights legislation? Because the civil rights legislation is supposed to guarantee boarding rights to Negroes from those states.
And those senators from those states know that if the Negroes in those states can vote, those senators are down the drain.
[applause] The representatives of those states go down the drain.
And in the Constitution of this country it has a stipulation, wherein, whenever the rights, the voting rights of people in a certain district are violated, then the representative who's from that particular district, according to the Constitution, is supposed to be expelled from the Congress.
Now, if this particular aspect of the Constitution was enforced, why, you wouldn't have a cracker in Washington, D.
.
[applause]But what would happen? When you expel the Dixiecrat, you're expelling the Democrat.
When you destroy the power of the Dixiecrat, you are destroying the power of the Democratic Party.
So how in the world can the Democratic Party in the South actually side with you, in sincerity, when all of its power is based in the South?These Northern Democrats are in cahoots with the southern Democrats.
[applause] They're playing a giant con game, a political con game.
You know how it goes.
One of 'em comes to you and make believe he's for you.
And he's in cahoots with the other one that's not for you.
Why? Because neither one of 'em is for you.
But they got to make you go with one of 'em or the other.
So this is a con game, and this is what they've been doing with you and me all of these years.
First thing, Johnson got off the plane when he become president, he ask, "Where's Dickey?" You know who Dickey is? Dickey is old southern cracker Richard Russell.
Lookie here! Yes, Lyndon B.
Johnson's best friend is the one who is a head, who's heading the forces that are filibustering civil rights legislation.
You tell me how in the hell is he going to be Johnson's best friend? [applause] How can Johnson be his friend and your friend too? No, that man is too tricky.
Especially if his friend is still ol' Dickey.
[laughter, applause]Whenever the Negroes keep the Democrats in power they're keeping the Dixiecrats in power.
This is true! A vote for a Democrat is nothing but a vote for a Dixiecrat.
I know you don't like me saying that.
I'm not the kind of person who come here to say what you like.
I'm going to tell you the truth whether you like it or not.
[applause]Up here in the North you have the same thing.
The Democratic Party don't – they don't do it that way.
They got a thing they call gerrymandering.
They maneuver you out of power.
Even though you can vote they fix it so you're voting for nobody.
They got you going and coming.
In the South they're outright political wolves, in the North they're political foxes.
A fox and a wolf are both canine, both belong to the dog family.
[laughter, applause] Now, you take your choice.
You going to choose a northern dog or a southern dog? Because either dog you choose, I guarantee you, you'll still be in the doghouse.
This is why I say it's the ballot or the bullet.
It's liberty or it's death.
It's freedom for everybody or freedom for nobody.
[applause] America today finds herself in a unique situation.
Historically, revolutions are bloody, oh yes they are.
They have never had a bloodless revolution.
Or a non-violent revolution.
That don't happen even in Hollywood [laughter] You don't have a revolution in which you love your enemy.
And you don't have a revolution in which you are begging the system of exploitation to integrate you into it.
Revolutions overturn systems.
Revolutions destroy systems.
A revolution is bloody, but America is in a unique position.
She's the only country in history, in the position actually to become involved in a bloodless revolution.
The Russian Revolution was bloody, Chinese Revolution was bloody, French Revolution was bloody, Cuban Revolution was bloody.
And there was nothing more bloody than the American Revolution.
But today, this country can become involved in a revolution that won't take bloodshed.
All she's got to do is give the black man in this country everything that's due him, everything.
[applause]I hope that the white man can see this.
'Cause if you don't see it you're finished.
If you don't see it you're going to become involved in some action in which you don't have a chance.
We don't care anything about your atomic bomb; it's useless, because other countries have atomic bombs.
When two or three different countries have atomic bombs, nobody can use them.
So it means that the white man today is without a weapon.
If you want some action you've got to come on down to Earth, and there's more black people on Earth than there are white people.
[applause]I only got a couple more minutes.
The white man can never win another war on the ground.
His days of war – victory – his days of battleground victory are over.
Can I prove it? Yes.
Take all the action that's going on this Earth right now that he's involved in.
Tell me where he's winning – nowhere.
Why, some rice farmers, some rice farmers! Some rice-eaters ran him out of Korea, yes they ran him out of Korea.
Rice-eaters, with nothing but gym shoes and a rifle and a bowl of rice, took him and his tanks and his napalm and all that other action he's supposed to have and ran him across the Yalu.
Why? Because the day that he can win on the ground has passed.
Up in French Indochina, those little peasants, rice-growers, took on the might of the French army and ran all the Frenchmen, you remember Dien Bien Phu! The same thing happened in Algeria, in Africa.
They didn't have anything but a rifle.
The French had all these highly mechanized instruments of warfare.
But they put some guerilla action on.
And a white man can't fight a guerilla warfare.
Guerilla action takes heart, take nerve, and he doesn't have that.
[cheering] He's brave when he's got tanks.
He's brave when he's got planes.
He's brave when he's got bombs.
He's brave when he's got a whole lot of company along with him.
But you take that little man from Africa and Asia; turn him loose in the woods with a blade.
A blade.
[cheering] That's all he needs.
All he needs is a blade.
And when the sun comes down – goes down and it's dark, it's even-Stephen.
[cheering]So it's the, it's the ballot or the bullet.
Today, our people can see that we're faced with a government conspiracy.
This government has failed us.
The senators who are filibustering concerning your and my rights, that's the government.
Don't say it's southern senators, this is the government.
This is a government filibuster.
It's not a segregationist filibuster, it's a government filibuster.
Any kind of activity that takes place on the floor of the Congress or the Senate, that's the government.
Any kind of dilly-dallying, that's the government.
Any kind of pussy-footing, that's the government.
Any kind of act that's designed to delay or deprive you and me, right now, of getting full rights, that's the government that's responsible.
And anytime you find the government involved in a conspiracy to violate the citizenship or the civil rights of a people in 1964, then you are wasting your time going to that government expecting redress.
Instead you have to take that government to the world court and accuse it of genocide and all of the other crimes that it is guilty of today.
[applause]So those of us whose political and economic and social philosophy is black nationalism have become involved in the civil rights struggle.
We have injected ourselves into the civil rights struggle.
And we intend to expand it from the level of civil rights to the level of human rights.
As long as you fight it on the level of civil rights, you're under Uncle Sam's jurisdiction.
You're going to his court expecting him to correct the problem.
He created the problem.
He's the criminal! You don't take your case to the criminal, you take your criminal to court.
[applause]When the government of South Africa began to trample upon the human rights of the people of South Africa they were taken to the U.
.
When the government of Portugal began to trample upon the rights of our brothers and sisters in Angola, it was taken before the U.
.
Why, even the white man took the Hungarian question to the U.
.
And just this week, Chief Justice Goldberg was crying over three million Jews in Russia, about their human rights – charging Russia with violating the U.
.
Charter because of its mistreatment of the human rights of Jews in Russia.
Now you tell me how can the plight of everybody on this Earth reach the halls of the United Nations and you have twenty-two million Afro-Americans whose churches are being bombed, whose little girls are being murdered, whose leaders are being shot down in broad daylight? Now you tell me why the leaders of this struggle have never taken [recording impaired ] [their case to the U.
.
]So our next move is to take the entire civil rights struggle – problem – into the United Nations and let the world see that Uncle Sam is guilty of violating the human rights of 22 million Afro-Americans right down to the year of 1964 and still has the audacity or the nerve to stand up and represent himself as the leader of the free world? [cheering] Not only is he a crook, he's a hypocrite.
Here he is standing up in front of other people, Uncle Sam, with the blood of your and mine mothers and fathers on his hands.
With the blood dripping down his jaws like a bloody-jawed wolf.
And still got the nerve to point his finger at other countries.
In 1964 you can't even get civil rights legislation and this man has got the nerve to stand up and talk about South Africa or talk about Nazi Germany or talk about Portugal.
No, no more days like those! [applause]So I say in my conclusion, the only way we're going to solve it: we got to unite.
We got to work together in unity and harmony.
And black nationalism is the key.
How we gonna overcome the tendency to be at each other's throats that always exists in our neighborhood? And the reason this tendency exists – the strategy of the white man has always been divide and conquer.
He keeps us divided in order to conquer us.
He tells you, I'm for separation and you for integration, and keep us fighting with each other.
No, I'm not for separation and you're not for integration, what you and I are for is freedom.
[applause] Only, you think that integration will get you freedom; I think that separation will get me freedom.
We both got the same objective, we just got different ways of getting' at it.
[applause]So I studied this man, Billy Graham, who preaches white nationalism.
That's what he preaches.
[applause] I say, that's what he preaches.
The whole church structure in this country is white nationalism, you go inside a white church – that's what they preaching, white nationalism.
They got Jesus white, Mary white, God white, everybody white – that's white nationalism.
[cheering]So what he does – the way he circumvents the jealousy and envy that he ordinarily would incur among the heads of the church – whenever you go into an area where the church already is, you going to run into trouble.
Because they got that thing, what you call it, syndicated … they got a syndicate just like the racketeers have.
I'm going to say what's on my mind because the preachers already proved to you that they got a syndicate.
[applause] And when you're out in the rackets, whenever you're getting in another man's territory, you know, they gang up on you.
And that's the same way with you.
You run into the same thing.
So how Billy Graham gets around that, instead of going into somebody else's territory, like he going to start a new church, he doesn't try and start a church, he just goes in preaching Christ.
And he says anybody who believe in him, you go wherever you find him.
So, this helps all the churches, and since it helps all the churches, they don't fight him.
Well, we going to do the same thing, only our gospel is black nationalism.
His gospel is white nationalism, our gospel is black nationalism.
And the gospel of black nationalism, as I told you, means you should control your own, the politics of your community, the economy of your community, and all of the society in which you live should be under your control.
And once you…feel that this philosophy will solve your problem, go join any church where that's preached.
Don't join any church where white nationalism is preached.
Why, you can go to a Negro church and be exposed to white nationalism.
'Cause when you are on – when you walk in a Negro church and see a white Jesus and a white Mary and some white angels, that Negro church is preaching white nationalism.
[applause]But, when you go to a church and you see the pastor of that church with a philosophy and a program that's designed to bring black people together and elevate black people, join that church.
Join that church.
If you see where the NAACP is preaching and practicing that which is designed to make black nationalism materialize, join the NAACP.
Join any kind of organization – civic, religious, fraternal, political or otherwise that's based on lifting the black man up and making him master of his own community.
Mr.
Speaker, Mr.
President, Members of the Congress:I speak tonight for the dignity of man and the destiny of democracy.
I urge every member of both parties, Americans of all religions and of all colors, from every section of this country, to join me in that cause.
At times history and fate meet at a single time in a single place to shape a turning point in man's unending search for freedom.
So it was at Lexington and Concord.
So it was a century ago at Appomattox.
So it was last week in Selma, Alabama.
There, long-suffering men and women peacefully protested the denial of their rights as Americans.
Many were brutally assaulted.
One good man, a man of God, was killed.
There is no cause for pride in what has happened in Selma.
There is no cause for self-satisfaction in the long denial of equal rights of millions of Americans.
But there is cause for hope and for faith in our democracy in what is happening here tonight.
For the cries of pain and the hymns and protests of oppressed people have summoned into convocation all the majesty of this great government -- the government of the greatest nation on earth.
Our mission is at once the oldest and the most basic of this country: to right wrong, to do justice, to serve man.
In our time we have come to live with the moments of great crisis.
Our lives have been marked with debate about great issues -- issues of war and peace, issues of prosperity and depression.
But rarely in any time does an issue lay bare the secret heart of America itself.
Rarely are we met with a challenge, not to our growth or abundance, or our welfare or our security, but rather to the values, and the purposes, and the meaning of our beloved nation.
The issue of equal rights for American Negroes is such an issue.
And should we defeat every enemy, and should we double our wealth and conquer the stars, and still be unequal to this issue, then we will have failed as a people and as a nation.
For with a country as with a person, "What is a man profited, if he shall gain the whole world, and lose his own soul?"There is no Negro problem.
There is no Southern problem.
There is no Northern problem.
There is only an American problem.
And we are met here tonight as Americans -- not as Democrats or Republicans.
We are met here as Americans to solve that problem.
This was the first nation in the history of the world to be founded with a purpose.
The great phrases of that purpose still sound in every American heart, North and South: "All men are created equal," "government by consent of the governed," "give me liberty or give me death.
 Well, those are not just clever words, or those are not just empty theories.
In their name Americans have fought and died for two centuries, and tonight around the world they stand there as guardians of our liberty, risking their lives.
Those words are a promise to every citizen that he shall share in the dignity of man.
This dignity cannot be found in a man's possessions; it cannot be found in his power, or in his position.
It really rests on his right to be treated as a man equal in opportunity to all others.
It says that he shall share in freedom, he shall choose his leaders, educate his children, provide for his family according to his ability and his merits as a human being.
To apply any other test -- to deny a man his hopes because of his color, or race, or his religion, or the place of his birth is not only to do injustice, it is to deny America and to dishonor the dead who gave their lives for American freedom.
Our fathers believed that if this noble view of the rights of man was to flourish, it must be rooted in democracy.
The most basic right of all was the right to choose your own leaders.
The history of this country, in large measure, is the history of the expansion of that right to all of our people.
Many of the issues of civil rights are very complex and most difficult.
But about this there can and should be no argument.
Every American citizen must have an equal right to vote.
There is no reason which can excuse the denial of that right.
There is no duty which weighs more heavily on us than the duty we have to ensure that right.
Yet the harsh fact is that in many places in this country men and women are kept from voting simply because they are Negroes.
Every device of which human ingenuity is capable has been used to deny this right.
The Negro citizen may go to register only to be told that the day is wrong, or the hour is late, or the official in charge is absent.
And if he persists, and if he manages to present himself to the registrar, he may be disqualified because he did not spell out his middle name or because he abbreviated a word on the application.
And if he manages to fill out an application, he is given a test.
The registrar is the sole judge of whether he passes this test.
He may be asked to recite the entire Constitution, or explain the most complex provisions of State law.
And even a college degree cannot be used to prove that he can read and write.
For the fact is that the only way to pass these barriers is to show a white skin.
Experience has clearly shown that the existing process of law cannot overcome systematic and ingenious discrimination.
No law that we now have on the books -- and I have helped to put three of them there -- can ensure the right to vote when local officials are determined to deny it.
In such a case our duty must be clear to all of us.
The Constitution says that no person shall be kept from voting because of his race or his color.
We have all sworn an oath before God to support and to defend that Constitution.
We must now act in obedience to that oath.
Wednesday, I will send to Congress a law designed to eliminate illegal barriers to the right to vote.
The broad principles of that bill will be in the hands of the Democratic and Republican leaders tomorrow.
After they have reviewed it, it will come here formally as a bill.
I am grateful for this opportunity to come here tonight at the invitation of the leadership to reason with my friends, to give them my views, and to visit with my former colleagues.
 I've had prepared a more comprehensive analysis of the legislation which I had intended to transmit to the clerk tomorrow, but which I will submit to the clerks tonight.
But I want to really discuss with you now, briefly, the main proposals of this legislation.
This bill will strike down restrictions to voting in all elections -- Federal, State, and local -- which have been used to deny Negroes the right to vote.
 This bill will establish a simple, uniform standard which cannot be used, however ingenious the effort, to flout our Constitution.
It will provide for citizens to be registered by officials of the United States Government, if the State officials refuse to register them.
It will eliminate tedious, unnecessary lawsuits which delay the right to vote.
Finally, this legislation will ensure that properly registered individuals are not prohibited from voting.
I will welcome the suggestions from all of the Members of Congress -- I have no doubt that I will get some -- on ways and means to strengthen this law and to make it effective.
But experience has plainly shown that this is the only path to carry out the command of the Constitution.
To those who seek to avoid action by their National Government in their own communities, who want to and who seek to maintain purely local control over elections, the answer is simple: open your polling places to all your people.
Allow men and women to register and vote whatever the color of their skin.
Extend the rights of citizenship to every citizen of this land.
There is no constitutional issue here.
The command of the Constitution is plain.
There is no moral issue.
It is wrong -- deadly wrong -- to deny any of your fellow Americans the right to vote in this country.
There is no issue of States' rights or national rights.
There is only the struggle for human rights.
I have not the slightest doubt what will be your answer.
But the last time a President sent a civil rights bill to the Congress, it contained a provision to protect voting rights in Federal elections.
That civil rights bill was passed after eight long months of debate.
And when that bill came to my desk from the Congress for my signature, the heart of the voting provision had been eliminated.
This time, on this issue, there must be no delay, or no hesitation, or no compromise with our purpose.
We cannot, we must not, refuse to protect the right of every American to vote in every election that he may desire to participate in.
And we ought not, and we cannot, and we must not wait another eight months before we get a bill.
We have already waited a hundred years and more, and the time for waiting is gone.
So I ask you to join me in working long hours -- nights and weekends, if necessary -- to pass this bill.
And I don't make that request lightly.
For from the window where I sit with the problems of our country, I recognize that from outside this chamber is the outraged conscience of a nation, the grave concern of many nations, and the harsh judgment of history on our acts.
But even if we pass this bill, the battle will not be over.
What happened in Selma is part of a far larger movement which reaches into every section and State of America.
It is the effort of American Negroes to secure for themselves the full blessings of American life.
Their cause must be our cause too.
Because it's not just Negroes, but really it's all of us, who must overcome the crippling legacy of bigotry and injustice.
And we shall overcome.
As a man whose roots go deeply into Southern soil, I know how agonizing racial feelings are.
I know how difficult it is to reshape the attitudes and the structure of our society.
But a century has passed, more than a hundred years since the Negro was freed.
And he is not fully free tonight.
It was more than a hundred years ago that Abraham Lincoln, a great President of another party, signed the Emancipation Proclamation; but emancipation is a proclamation, and not a fact.
A century has passed, more than a hundred years, since equality was promised.
And yet the Negro is not equal.
A century has passed since the day of promise.
And the promise is un-kept.
The time of justice has now come.
I tell you that I believe sincerely that no force can hold it back.
It is right in the eyes of man and God that it should come.
And when it does, I think that day will brighten the lives of every American.
For Negroes are not the only victims.
How many white children have gone uneducated? How many white families have lived in stark poverty? How many white lives have been scarred by fear, because we've wasted our energy and our substance to maintain the barriers of hatred and terror?And  so I say to all of you here, and to all in the nation tonight, that those who appeal to you to hold on to the past do so at the cost of denying you your future.
This great, rich, restless country can offer opportunity and education and hope to all, all black and white, all North and South, sharecropper and city dweller.
These are the enemies: poverty, ignorance, disease.
They're our enemies, not our fellow man, not our neighbor.
And these enemies too -- poverty, disease, and ignorance: we shall overcome.
Now let none of us in any section look with prideful righteousness on the troubles in another section, or the problems of our neighbors.
There's really no part of America where the promise of equality has been fully kept.
In Buffalo as well as in Birmingham, in Philadelphia as well as Selma, Americans are struggling for the fruits of freedom.
This is one nation.
What happens in Selma or in Cincinnati is a matter of legitimate concern to every American.
But let each of us look within our own hearts and our own communities, and let each of us put our shoulder to the wheel to root out injustice wherever it exists.
As we meet here in this peaceful, historic chamber tonight, men from the South, some of whom were at Iwo Jima, men from the North who have carried Old Glory to far corners of the world and brought it back without a stain on it, men from the East and from the West, are all fighting together without regard to religion, or color, or region, in Vietnam.
Men from every region fought for us across the world twenty years ago.
And now in these common dangers and these common sacrifices, the South made its contribution of honor and gallantry no less than any other region in the Great Republic -- and in some instances, a great many of them, more.
And I have not the slightest doubt that good men from everywhere in this country, from the Great Lakes to the Gulf of Mexico, from the Golden Gate to the harbors along the Atlantic, will rally now together in this cause to vindicate the freedom of all Americans.
For all of us owe this duty; and I believe that all of us will respond to it.
Your President makes that request of every American.
The real hero of this struggle is the American Negro.
His actions and protests, his courage to risk safety and even to risk his life, have awakened the conscience of this nation.
His demonstrations have been designed to call attention to injustice, designed to provoke change, designed to stir reform.
He has called upon us to make good the promise of America.
And who among us can say that we would have made the same progress were it not for his persistent bravery, and his faith in American democracy.
For at the real heart of battle for equality is a deep seated belief in the democratic process.
Equality depends not on the force of arms or tear gas but depends upon the force of moral right; not on recourse to violence but on respect for law and order.
And there have been many pressures upon your President and there will be others as the days come and go.
But I pledge you tonight that we intend to fight this battle where it should be fought -- in the courts, and in the Congress, and in the hearts of men.
We must preserve the right of free speech and the right of free assembly.
But the right of free speech does not carry with it, as has been said, the right to holler fire in a crowded theater.
We must preserve the right to free assembly.
But free assembly does not carry with it the right to block public thoroughfares to traffic.
We do have a right to protest, and a right to march under conditions that do not infringe the constitutional rights of our neighbors.
And I intend to protect all those rights as long as I am permitted to serve in this office.
We will guard against violence, knowing it strikes from our hands the very weapons which we seek: progress, obedience to law, and belief in American values.
In Selma, as elsewhere, we seek and pray for peace.
We seek order.
We seek unity.
But we will not accept the peace of stifled rights, or the order imposed by fear, or the unity that stifles protest.
For peace cannot be purchased at the cost of liberty.
In Selma tonight -- and we had a good day there -- as in every city, we are working for a just and peaceful settlement And we must all remember that after this speech I am making tonight, after the police and the FBI and the Marshals have all gone, and after you have promptly passed this bill, the people of Selma and the other cities of the Nation must still live and work together.
And when the attention of the nation has gone elsewhere, they must try to heal the wounds and to build a new community.
This cannot be easily done on a battleground of violence, as the history of the South itself shows.
It is in recognition of this that men of both races have shown such an outstandingly impressive responsibility in recent days -- last Tuesday, again today.
The bill that I am presenting to you will be known as a civil rights bill.
But, in a larger sense, most of the program I am recommending is a civil rights program.
Its object is to open the city of hope to all people of all races.
Because all Americans just must have the right to vote.
And we are going to give them that right.
All Americans must have the privileges of citizenship -- regardless of race.
And they are going to have those privileges of citizenship -- regardless of race.
But I would like to caution you and remind you that to exercise these privileges takes much more than just legal right.
It requires a trained mind and a healthy body.
It requires a decent home, and the chance to find a job, and the opportunity to escape from the clutches of poverty.
Of course, people cannot contribute to the nation if they are never taught to read or write, if their bodies are stunted from hunger, if their sickness goes untended, if their life is spent in hopeless poverty just drawing a welfare check.
So we want to open the gates to opportunity.
But we're also going to give all our people, black and white, the help that they need to walk through those gates.
My first job after college was as a teacher in Cotulla, Texas, in a small Mexican-American school.
Few of them could speak English, and I couldn't speak much Spanish.
My students were poor and they often came to class without breakfast, hungry.
And they knew, even in their youth, the pain of prejudice.
They never seemed to know why people disliked them.
But they knew it was so, because I saw it in their eyes.
I often walked home late in the afternoon, after the classes were finished, wishing there was more that I could do.
But all I knew was to teach them the little that I knew, hoping that it might help them against the hardships that lay ahead.
And somehow you never forget what poverty and hatred can do when you see its scars on the hopeful face of a young child.
I never thought then, in 1928, that I would be standing here in 1965.
It never even occurred to me in my fondest dreams that I might have the chance to help the sons and daughters of those students and to help people like them all over this country.
But now I do have that chance -- and I'll let you in on a secret -- I mean to use it.
And I hope that you will use it with me.
This is the richest and the most powerful country which ever occupied this globe.
The might of past empires is little compared to ours.
But I do not want to be the President who built empires, or sought grandeur, or extended dominion.
I want to be the President who educated young children to the wonders of their world.
I want to be the President who helped to feed the hungry and to prepare them to be tax-payers instead of tax-eaters.
I want to be the President who helped the poor to find their own way and who protected the right of every citizen to vote in every election.
I want to be the President who helped to end hatred among his fellow men, and who promoted love among the people of all races and all regions and all parties.
I want to be the President who helped to end war among the brothers of this earth.
And so, at the request of your beloved Speaker, and the Senator from Montana, the majority leader, the Senator from Illinois, the minority leader, Mr.
McCulloch, and other Members of both parties, I came here tonight -- not as President Roosevelt came down one time, in person, to veto a bonus bill, not as President Truman came down one time to urge the passage of a railroad bill -- but I came down here to ask you to share this task with me, and to share it with the people that we both work for.
I want this to be the Congress, Republicans and Democrats alike, which did all these things for all these people.
Beyond this great chamber, out yonder in fifty States, are the people that we serve.
Who can tell what deep and unspoken hopes are in their hearts tonight as they sit there and listen.
We all can guess, from our own lives, how difficult they often find their own pursuit of happiness, how many problems each little family has.
They look most of all to themselves for their futures.
But I think that they also look to each of us.
Above the pyramid on the great seal of the United States it says in Latin: "God has favored our undertaking.
 God will not favor everything that we do.
 It is rather our duty to divine His will.
But I cannot help believing that He truly understands and that He really favors the undertaking that we begin here tonight.
